Maine, session 132, LD1476.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2504 is enacted to read:
§2504. Homeless shelter support fee
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Camping site" has the same meaning as in Title 33, section 589, subsection 3.
B. "Living quarters" has the same meaning as in Title 36, section 1752, subsection 6.
C. "Recreational vehicle" has the same meaning as in Title 10, section 1432, subsection
18-A.
2. Fee established. Beginning January 1, 2026, a fee of $2 is imposed on the rental
of living quarters in a lodging place or the rental of a recreational vehicle camping site.
3. Application of fee revenue. The revenue received from the fee imposed under
subsection 2 must be credited directly to the department to be used to fund initiatives that
support the operation of homeless shelters in the State.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.